
DI−96
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE

1HD−FTV ENGINE SUP (RM11 79E)

DTC P1250/34* Turbocharger system malfunction

DTC P1255/34* Turbocharger stick detected (Close)

DTC P1256/34* Turbocharger stick detected (Open)

HINT:
*: Only for Europe

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P1250/34
When the condition that the turbocharger pressure exceeds the
standard value for 5 sec. or more is detected.

S VNT valve
S Turbocharger
S EGR valve

P1255/34
Condition that turbocharger pressure is high for 20 sec. is
detected twice.

S EGR valve
S Vacuum hose
S E−VRV for intake pressure charge
S VSV for turbo pressure sensor

P1256/34 Turbocharger pressure is low for 40 sec. is detected twice.

VSV for turbo pressure sensor
SAir flowmeter
SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0105/35 on page DI−32.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
IfDTCP0 105/35 isoutputsimultaneously, first troubleshootDTCP0 105/35.
When using intelligent tester II:

1 Checkconnectionofvacuumhose.

NG Repair or replace.

OK

DIDY7−01
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2CheckvacuumbetweenturbochargerandE −VRVfor intakepressurechangeat
900 rpm.

PREPARATION:
(a)Usinga3 −wayconnector, connectavacuumgauge to thehosebetween theE −VRVand turbocharger.
(b)Warmup theengine toabove80 ˚ C (176˚ F).
CHECK:
Check the vacuum at 900 rpm.
RESULT:

Type Vacuum

I 0kPa(0mmHg,0 in.Hg) to50kPa(375mmHg, 14.8 in.Hg)

II Above50kPa(375mmHg, 14.8 in.Hg)

Type II Go to step 7.

Type I

3 Check voltage between terminal VNT of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal VNT of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage:9 to 14 V

Reference: INSPECTIONUSINGOSCILLOSCOPE
During EGR system is ON (engine speed 900 rpm), check the
waveformbetween terminalsVNTandE 1 of theengineECU
connector.
HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.

NGGotostep5.

OK
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4CheckoperationofE −VRVfor intakepressurechange.

PREPARATION:
(a)Disconnect thevacuumhoses fromtheE −VRV.
(b) Connect the intelligent tester II to the DLC3.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester

II main switch ON.
(d) Select the Active Test mode on the intelligent tester II.
CHECK:
Check theoperationof theE −VRVwhen it isoperatedby the
intelligent tester II.
OK:

E−VRVON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
E−VRVOFF:
Air from port E flows out through air filter.

OK Go to step 7.

NG

5CheckE −VRVfor intakepressurechange(SeePubNo.RM896E,pageTC −15).

NGReplaceE −VRV.

OK

6Checkforopenandshort inharnessandconnectorbetweenE −VRVandengine
ECU, and E−VRV and EFI OR ECD relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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7CheckresistanceofVSVfor turbopressuresensor (SeePubNo.RM6 17E,page
TC−19).

NG Replace VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

OK

8 Check VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)Disconnect theE 16connectorof theengineECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check VSV function.
(a) Connect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and

body ground (VSV is ON).
(b) Disconnect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and

body ground (VSV is OFF).
OK:

VSV is ON:
Air from pipe E flows out through air filter.
VSV is OFF:
Air from pipe E flows out through pipe G.

OKCheckandreplaceengineECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

9 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
VSV for turbo pressure sensor, VSV for turbo pressure sensor and EFI OR ECD
relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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10 Check turbocharger assembly (See Pub No. RM896E, page TC−1 ).

NG Replace turbocharger.

OK

11 Check EGR valve (See Pub No. RM896E, page EC−2).

NG Replace EGR valve.

OK

12 Check air flow meter (See page DI−64).

NG Replace air flow meter.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .

When not using intelligent tester II:

1 Check connection of vacuum hose.

NG Repair or replace.

OK
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2 Check vacuum between turbocharger and E−VRV for intake pressure change at
900 rpm.

PREPARATION:
(a) Using a 3−way connector, connect a vacuum gauge to the hose between the E−VRV and trubocharger.
(b) Warm up the engine to above 80˚C (176˚F).
CHECK:
Check the vacuum at 900 rpm.
RESULT:

Type Vacuum

I 0 kPa (0 mmHg, 0 in.Hg) to 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8 in.Hg)

II Above 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8 in.Hg)

Type II Go to step 6.

Type I

3 Check operation of E−VRV.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the V14 connector from the engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the E−VRV operation.

(1) Connect between terminal VNT of the engine ECU
connector and body ground (ON).

(2) Disconnect between terminal VNT of the engine
ECU connector and body ground (OFF).

OK:
E−VRV ON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
E−VRV OFF:
Air from port E flows out through air filter.

OK Go to step 6.

NG
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4 Check E−VRV for intake pressure change (See Pub No. RM896E, page TC−15).

NG Replace E−VRV.

OK

5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between E−VRV and engine
ECU, and E−VRV and EFI OR ECD relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

6 Check resistance of VSV for turbo pressure sensor (See Pub No. RM617E, page
TC−19).

NG Replace VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

OK
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7 Check VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector of the engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check VSV function.
(a) Connect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and

body ground (VSV is ON).
(b) Disconnect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and

body ground (VSV is OFF).
OK:

VSV is ON:
Air from pipe E flows out through air filter.
VSV is OFF:
Air from pipe E flows out through pipe G.

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

8 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
VSV for turbo pressure sensor, VSV for turbo pressure sensor and EFI OR ECD
relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

9 Check turbocharger assembly (See Pub No. RM896E, page TC−1).

NG Replace turbocharger.

OK
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10 Check EGR valve (See Pub No. RM896E, page EC−2).

NG Replace EGR valve.

OK

11 Check air flow meter (See page DI−64).

NG Replace air flow meter.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


